Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0169.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 part 1 line-item appropriations Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of corrections for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 16.0 Full-time equated classified positions 13,207.0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,254,778,700 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,254,778,700 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 5,203,700 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 12,122,000 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 45,904,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,191,548,800 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 16.0 Full-time equated classified positions 412.0 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 16.0 $ 2,362,900 Administrative hearings officers 4,070,200 Budget and operations administration--FTEs 316.0 45,097,300 Compensatory buyout and union leave bank 100 Corrections officer pensions 31,000,000 County jail reimbursement program 14,814,600 Employee wellness programming--FTEs 8.0 2,395,600 Equipment and special maintenance 1,559,700 Executive direction--FTEs 28.0 5,515,200 Judicial data warehouse user fees 50,600 New custody staff training 23,815,400 Prison industries operations--FTEs 60.0 10,309,100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Property management 2,638,000 Prosecutorial and detainer expenses 3,801,000 Worker's compensation 8,770,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 156,200,600 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOJ, prison rape elimination act grant 674,700 Special revenue funds: Correctional industries revolving fund 10,309,100 Correctional industries revolving fund 110 721,600 Jail reimbursement program fund 5,900,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 138,595,200 Sec. 103. OFFENDER SUCCESS ADMINISTRATION Full-time equated classified positions 343.9 Community corrections comprehensive plans and services $ 14,198,100 Criminal justice reinvestment 2,548,400 Education/skilled trades/career readiness programs--FTEs 259.9 39,336,400 Enhanced food technology program--FTEs 11.0 1,711,200 Goodwill Flip the Script 1,250,000 Higher education in prison 2,000,000 Offender success community partners 19,425,000 Offender success federal grants 751,000 Offender success programming 15,742,200 Offender success services--FTEs 73.0 14,905,400 Probation residential services 13,575,500 Public safety initiative 250,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Transitional housing development project 2,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 127,693,200 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOJ, prisoner reintegration 751,000 Federal education funding 1,632,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 125,309,400 Sec. 104. FIELD OPERATIONS ADMINISTRATION Full-time equated classified positions 1,873.5 Field operations--FTEs 1,842.5 $ 234,599,100 Parole board operations--FTEs 31.0 4,061,100 Parole/probation services 940,000 Residential alternative to prison program 1,500,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 241,100,200 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Community tether program reimbursement 275,000 Reentry center offender reimbursements 10,000 Supervision fees 6,630,500 Supervision fees set-aside 940,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 233,244,700 Sec. 105. CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES ADMINISTRATION Full-time equated classified positions 678.0 Body-worn cameras--FTEs 8.0 $ 3,821,800 Central records--FTEs 43.0 5,121,100 Contraband prevention 2,750,000 Correctional facilities administration--FTEs 37.0 6,980,900 Housing inmates in federal institutions 511,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Inmate housing fund 100 Inmate legal services 290,900 Intelligence unit--FTEs 30.0 4,068,700 Leased beds and alternatives to leased beds 100 Prison food service--FTEs 324.0 77,620,600 Prison store operations--FTEs 32.0 3,645,400 Transportation--FTEs 204.0 35,932,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 140,743,200 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOJ-BOP, federal prisoner reimbursement 411,000 SSA-SSI, incentive payment 272,000 Special revenue funds: Correctional industries revolving fund 110 886,400 Resident stores 3,645,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 135,528,400 Sec. 106. HEALTH CARE Full-time equated classified positions 1,525.3 Clinical complexes--FTEs 1,034.3 $ 177,805,900 Health care administration--FTEs 18.0 3,765,900 Healthy Michigan plan administration--FTEs 12.0 1,069,200 Hepatitis C treatment 10,499,100 Interdepartmental grant to health and human services, eligibility specialists 120,200 Mental health and substance use disorder treatment services--FTEs 461.0 67,780,200 Prisoner health care services 117,540,700 Vaccination program 691,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 379,272,400 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal revenues and reimbursements 427,400 Special revenue funds: Prisoner health care co-payments 257,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 378,587,800 Sec. 107. CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES Full-time equated classified positions 8,374.3 Alger Correctional Facility - Munising--FTEs 259.0 $ 34,805,000 Baraga Correctional Facility - Baraga--FTEs 295.8 40,914,000 Bellamy Creek Correctional Facility - Ionia--FTEs 415.2 54,570,100 Carson City Correctional Facility - Carson City--FTEs 422.4 56,263,200 Central Michigan Correctional Facility - St. Louis--FTEs 386.6 53,477,300 Charles E. Egeler Correctional Facility - Jackson--FTEs 386.6 52,918,000 Chippewa Correctional Facility - Kincheloe--FTEs 443.6 58,868,600 Cooper Street Correctional Facility - Jackson--FTEs 254.6 33,611,800 Detroit Detention Center--FTEs 75.8 11,847,000 Earnest C. Brooks Correctional Facility - Muskegon--FTEs 248.2 35,196,300 G. Robert Cotton Correctional Facility - Jackson--FTEs 396.0 51,549,700 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Gus Harrison Correctional Facility - Adrian--FTEs 299.0 41,677,200 Ionia Correctional Facility - Ionia--FTEs 293.3 39,964,900 Kinross Correctional Facility - Kincheloe--FTEs 247.3 35,852,800 Lakeland Correctional Facility - Coldwater--FTEs 275.4 38,226,700 Macomb Correctional Facility - New Haven--FTEs 313.3 43,326,900 Marquette Branch Prison - Marquette--FTEs 319.7 42,929,700 Muskegon Correctional Facility - Muskegon--FTEs 217.3 31,806,000 Newberry Correctional Facility - Newberry--FTEs 200.1 28,319,600 Oaks Correctional Facility - Eastlake--FTEs 289.4 40,701,900 Parnall Correctional Facility - Jackson--FTEs 266.1 34,877,400 Richard A. Handlon Correctional Facility - Ionia--FTEs 268.3 37,046,700 Saginaw Correctional Facility - Freeland--FTEs 276.9 38,521,700 Special Alternative Incarceration Program - Jackson--FTEs 26.2 3,639,000 St. Louis Correctional Facility - St. Louis--FTEs 306.6 43,821,100 Thumb Correctional Facility - Lapeer--FTEs 295.6 41,526,300 Womens Huron Valley Correctional Complex - Ypsilanti--FTEs 506.1 67,658,600 Woodland Correctional Facility - Whitmore Lake--FTEs 296.9 42,564,300 Northern region administration and support--FTEs 42.0 4,594,100 Southern region administration and support--FTEs 51.0 18,969,800 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,160,045,700 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOJ, state criminal assistance program 1,034,800 Special revenue funds: Local funds 11,847,000 State restricted fees, revenues, and reimbursements 102,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,147,061,800 Sec. 108. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 31,623,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 31,623,200 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Correctional industries revolving fund 110 183,000 Supervision fees set-aside 718,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 30,721,400 Sec. 109. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS A Brighter Way $ 500,000 Ambulance service reimbursements 100 Chance for Life 100 Eastern Michigan University 100,000 Facility cell block railing safety improvements 15,000,000 Goodwill Flip the Script 1,000,000 Peer recovery coaches 1,000,000 Reducing medical co-payments 500,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 18,100,200 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Special revenue funds: Work project lapse funds 15,600,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,500,100 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2025-2026 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $2,237,453,000.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $121,292,500.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS Community corrections comprehensive plans and services $ 14,198,100 County jail reimbursement program 14,814,600 Field Operations 73,153,200 Leased beds and alternatives to leased beds 100 Probation residential services 13,575,500 Prosecutorial and detainer expenses 4,801,000 Public safety initiative 2,000,000 Residential alternative to prison program 1,500,000 TOTAL $ 121,292,500 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "Administrative segregation" means confinement for maintenance of order or discipline to a cell or room apart from accommodations provided for inmates who are participating in programs of the facility. (b) "Department" means the department of corrections. (c) "Director" means the director of the department. (d) "DOJ" means the United States Department of Justice. (e) "DOJ-BOP" means the DOJ Bureau of Prisons. (f) "Evidence-based" means a decision-making process that integrates the best available research, clinician expertise, and client characteristics. (g) "FTE" means full-time equated position in the classified service of this state. (h) "Goal" means the intended or projected result of a comprehensive corrections plan or community corrections program to reduce repeat offending, criminogenic and high-risk behaviors, prison commitment rates, the length of stay in a jail, or to improve the utilization of a jail. (i) "Jail" means a facility operated by a local unit of government for the physical detention and correction of individuals charged with or convicted of criminal offenses. (j) "OCC" means the office of community corrections. (k) "Offender success" means that an offender has, with the support of the community, intervention of the field agent, and benefit of any participation in programs and treatment, made an adjustment while at liberty in the community such that the offender has not been sentenced to or returned to prison for the conviction of a new crime or the revocation of probation or parole. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (l) "Recidivism" means that term as defined in section 1 of 2017 PA 5, MCL 798.31. (m) "Serious emotional disturbance" means that term as defined in section 100d(3) of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100d. (n) "Serious mental illness" means that term as defined in section 100d(4) of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100d. (o) "SSA" means the United States Social Security Administration. (p) "SSA-SSI" means SSA supplemental security income. (q) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on corrections, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, the legislative corrections ombudsman, and the state budget office. Sec. 204. The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part. This requirement includes transmitting reports to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email and posting the reports on an internet site. Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (d) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured in facilities that employ union members. Sec. 206. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department or a prisoner because the employee or prisoner communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses not later than January 1. The report must list all travel outside this state by classified and unclassified employees in the immediately previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients and to the senate and house appropriations committees. The report must include the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, and other revenues. Sec. 208. The department shall not use funds appropriated in part 1 to hire a person to provide legal services that are the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 responsibility of the attorney general. This section does not apply to legal services for bonding activities or to outside services that the attorney general authorizes. Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. The state budget office shall submit the report to the standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees. Sec. 210. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,500,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for local contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 211. The department shall cooperate with the department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (d) The number of active department employees by job classification. (e) Job specifications and wage rates. Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees. Sec. 214. To the extent permissible under the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director of each department or agency receiving appropriations in part 1 shall take all reasonable steps to ensure geographically disadvantaged business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide services or supplies, or both. The director shall strongly encourage firms with which the department contracts to subcontract with certified geographically disadvantaged business enterprises for services, supplies, or both. As used in this section, "geographically disadvantaged business enterprises" means that term as defined in Executive Directive No. 2023-1. Sec. 215. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on the number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service classification, including a comparison by line item of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. The report must be submitted to the standard report recipients and to the senate and house appropriations committees. Sec. 217. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department may electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal and state guidelines. Sec. 218. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that took effect during the previous calendar year. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients and to the senate and house appropriations committees, the joint committee on administrative rules, the senate standing committee on civil rights, judiciary, and public safety, and the house standing committee on criminal justice. Sec. 219. To the extent possible, the department shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 220. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. A department or agency receiving an appropriation under this part or part 1 must notify the standard report recipients if an appropriation of funds 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 described under this section is projected to lapse. ?? Sec. 221. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government resources, programs, or facilities. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or interfere with the duties of the local health officer. Sec. 222. (1) Within 10 days after the effective date of this act, the department must provide a report to the standard report recipients containing the following information: (a) A list of any sections in this act that the department determines to be unenforceable, with a detailed legal rationale for those determinations, as applicable. (b) If a determination under subdivision (a) would affect the operations of a program or programs within the department, the department must report the estimated difference in cost between the policy outlined in the section determined to be unenforceable and the policy the department intends to pursue. (2) The department may coordinate with the executive office of the governor or other state departments or agencies to compile a statewide report for any departments or agencies required to submit a report substantially similar to the report described under subsection (1). Sec. 223. The department must provide a quarterly report to the standard report recipients detailing federal policy changes that do, or are expected to do, any of the following: (a) Affect the operations of the department. (b) Affect an industry, community, population, or other group regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department. (c) Affect regulations that currently protect the public to the extent that the regulations affect an industry, community, population, or other group regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the department. (d) Create a regulatory gap that could negatively impact the public. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Sec. 301. For 3 years after a felony offender is released from the department's jurisdiction, the department shall maintain the offender's file on the offender tracking information system and make it publicly accessible in the same manner as the file of the current offender. The department shall immediately remove the offender's file from the offender tracking information system upon determination that the offender was wrongfully convicted and the offender's file is not otherwise required to be maintained on the offender tracking information system. Sec. 303. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall submit a report not later than March 1 on the department's staff retention strategies. The report must include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (a) The department's strategies on how to improve employee engagement, how to improve employee wellness, and how to offer additional training and professional development for employees, including metrics the department is using to measure success of employee wellness programming. (b) Mechanisms by which the department receives employee feedback in areas under subdivision (a) and how the department 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 considers suggestions made by employees. (c) Steps the department has taken, and future plans and goals the department has for retention and improving employee wellness. Sec. 304. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall submit a report not later than March 1 on the number of employee departures. The report must include all of the following: (a) The number of corrections officers that departed from employment at a state correctional facility in the previous fiscal year and the number of years they worked for the department. (b) A chart that shows the normal distribution of employee departures in the positions described under subdivision (a) based on years of service. Years of service must be grouped into the following ranges: 1 to 3 years, 3 to 5 years, 5 to 10 years, 10 to 15 years, 15 to 20 years, and 20 and more years. (c) A section that shows the distinction between all of the following: (i) Recruits who are in training at the academy that depart employment. (ii) Recruits who are in training at a facility that depart employment. (iii) Employees who have been on the job that depart employment. (2) The department shall review all reasons for employee departures and summarize in the report required under this section the primary reasons for departure for each of the ranges of years of service described under subdivision (1)(b) based on the available responses. Sec. 305. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for prosecutorial and detainer expenses must be used to reimburse counties for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 housing and custody of parole violators and offenders being returned by the department from community placement who are available for return to institutional status and for prisoners who volunteer for placement in a county jail. (2) The fiscal year 2024-2025 rates must be increased by $20.00 for fiscal year 2025-2026 and subsequent fiscal years. Sec. 306. The department shall provide fiduciary oversight of funds received under the local corrections officers training act, 2003 PA 125, MCL 791.531 to 791.546. Sec. 307. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall issue a report not later than March 1 for vendor contracts with a value of $500,000.00 or more that includes all of the following: (a) The original start date and the current expiration date of each contract. (b) The number of available option years. (c) The number, if any, of contract compliance monitoring site visits completed by the department for each vendor in the previous fiscal year. (d) The number and amount of fines in the previous fiscal year for service-level agreement noncompliance for each vendor broken down by area of noncompliance. Sec. 308. The department must ensure that a prisoner telephone system is maintained. The prisoner telephone system must meet ongoing operational needs of the department while maintaining the lowest per-minute rate possible. The department must provide notice at least 45 days in advance of each of the following taking effect: (a) Changes to telephone rates. (b) Extending the telephone contract, including the department 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 exercising the option to extend the contract. (c) Rebidding the telephone contract. Sec. 309. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide for the training of all custody staff in effective and safe ways of handling prisoners with mental illness and referring prisoners to mental health treatment programs. Mental health awareness training must be incorporated into the training of new custody staff. Sec. 310. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall issue a report for all correctional facilities not later than January 1 that includes all of the following information for each facility: (a) The name, street address, and date of construction. (b) The current maintenance costs. (c) Any maintenance planned. (d) The current utility costs. (e) The expected future capital improvement costs. (f) The current unspent balance of any authorized capital outlay projects, including the original authorized amount. (g) The expected future useful life. Sec. 311. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide a report on the Michigan state industries program not later than December 1. The report must include, but is not limited to, all of the following information: (a) The locations of the programs. (b) The total number of participants at each location. (c) A description of job duties and typical inmate schedules, and the products that are produced. (d) How the program provides marketable skills that lead to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 employable outcomes after release from a department facility. Sec. 312. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for employee wellness programming must be used for post-traumatic stress outreach, treating mental health issues, peer support programs, and providing mental health programming for all department staff, including former employees. (2) Not later than December 15, the department shall submit a report on programs the department has established, the level of employee involvement, and expenditures made by the department for employee wellness programming. Sec. 313. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for new custody staff, the department shall work to hire and train new corrections officers to address attrition of corrections officers and to decrease overtime costs. The department shall submit quarterly reports on new employee schools. The reports must include all of the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal quarter, and as much of the information as possible for the current and next fiscal year: (a) The number of new employee schools that took place and the location of each. (b) The number of recruits that started in each employee school. (c) The number of recruits that graduated from each employee school and continued employment with the department. (2) Third quarter reports must outline steps the department has taken to obtain the highest number of recruits possible for each new employee school. A report prepared under this subsection must include, but is not limited to, all of the following information: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) Internal sources of recruitment, including transfers and promotions. (b) External sources of recruitment, including advertisements. (c) Job portals, social networking platforms, placement agencies, job fairs, campus placements, or professional entities used for recruitment. (d) Whether the department's website was used to advertise vacancies. Sec. 314. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall submit a quarterly report on the number of overtime hours worked by all custody staff, by facility. The report must include, for each facility, the reasons for overtime hours worked and the average number of overtime hours worked by active employees. Sec. 315. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department may establish agreements and exchange offender data with local, state, and federal agencies, law enforcement, community service and treatment providers, and research partners in order to improve offender success, reduce recidivism risk, and enhance public safety. This data sharing may include, but is not limited to, efforts to support all of the following: (a) Providing continuing access to behavioral health, physical health, and medication needs through community-based providers. (b) Establishing assistance program eligibility and participation. (c) Collaborating with community service providers for continued care and access to services for offenders. (d) Providing ongoing cognitive and behavioral treatment programming in the community. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (e) Providing substance abuse testing and referrals for counseling services and treatment. (f) Providing vocational skill training, job placement support, and monitoring employment attainment. (g) Determining educational attainment and needs. (h) Establishing accurate offender identification, criminal histories, and monitoring new criminal activity. (i) Measuring and evaluating treatment programs and services in support of evidence-based practices. Sec. 316. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the Department shall prepare a report of the following information by March 1 of each year: (1) The number of Department employees charged with the commission of a criminal offense committed in a correctional facility and during the employee's work hours in the previous fiscal year. The information shall be categorized by facility and shall specify the offense charged and the outcome of the charge. (2) The number of employees disciplined, demoted, or separated from service due to personal misconduct in the previous fiscal year. To the extent it does not disclose confidential personnel records, the information shall be organized by type of misconduct, nature of corrective action taken, and outcome of the corrective action. Sec. 317. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall submit 3-year and 5-year prison population projection updates not later than April 1, including explanations of the methodology and assumptions used in developing the projection updates. Sec. 318. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department shall provide an annual statistical report for the immediately preceding calendar year not later than June 30. The report must include, but not be limited to, the information as provided in the 2022 statistical report. Sec. 319. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall report the reincarceration recidivism rates of offenders based on available data. Sec. 320. (1) The department shall administer a county jail reimbursement program from the funds appropriated in part 1 for the purpose of reimbursing counties for housing in jails certain felons who otherwise would have been sentenced to prison. (2) The county jail reimbursement program must be used to reimburse counties for convicted felons in the custody of the sheriff if the conviction was for a crime committed on or after January 1, 1999 and 1 of the following applies: (a) The felon's sentencing guidelines recommended range upper limit is more than 18 months, the felon's sentencing guidelines recommended range lower limit is 12 months or less, the felon's prior record variable score is 35 or more points, and the felon's sentence is not for commission of a crime in crime class G or crime class H or a nonperson crime in crime class F under chapter XVII of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 777.1 to 777.69. (b) The felon's minimum sentencing guidelines range minimum is more than 12 months under the sentencing guidelines described in subdivision (a). (c) The felon was sentenced to jail for a felony committed while the felon was on parole and under the jurisdiction of the parole board and for which the sentencing guidelines recommended range for the minimum sentence has an upper limit of more than 18 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 months. (3) State reimbursement under this section must be $75.00 per diem per diverted offender for offenders with a presumptive prison guideline score, $65.00 per diem per diverted offender for offenders with a straddle cell guideline for a group 1 crime, and $50.00 per diem per diverted offender for offenders with a straddle cell guideline for a group 2 crime. Reimbursements must be paid for sentences up to a 1-year total. (4) County jail reimbursement program expenditures must not exceed the amount appropriated in part 1 for the county jail reimbursement program. Payments to counties under the county jail reimbursement program must be made in the order in which properly documented requests for reimbursements are received. A request is properly documented if it meets departmental requirements for documentation. Not later than October 15, the department shall distribute the documentation requirements to all counties. (5) Any county that receives funding under this section for the purpose of housing in jails certain felons who otherwise would have been sentenced to prison shall, as a condition of receiving the funding, report not later than September 30 an annual average jail capacity and annual average jail occupancy for the previous fiscal year. (6) Not later than February 1, the department shall report all of the following information: (a) The number of inmates sentenced to the custody of the sheriff and eligible for the county jail reimbursement program. (b) The total amount paid to counties under the county jail reimbursement program. (c) The total number of days inmates were in the custody of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the sheriff and eligible for the county jail reimbursement program. (d) The number of inmates sentenced to the custody of the sheriff under each of the 3 categories: presumptive prison, group 1 crime, and group 2 crime in subsection (3). (e) The total amount paid to counties under each of the 3 categories: presumptive prison, group 1 crime, and group 2 crime in subsection (3). (f) The total number of days inmates were in the custody of the sheriff under each of the 3 categories: presumptive prison, group 1 crime, and group 2 crime in subsection (3). (g) The estimated cost of housing inmates sentenced to the custody of the sheriff and eligible for the county jail reimbursement program as inmates of a state prison. (7) A county receiving reimbursement under subsection (3) must offer in-person visitation for all housed inmates within that county's jail. (8) As used in this section: (a) "Group 1 crime" means a crime in 1 or more of the following offense categories: arson, assault, assaultive other, burglary, criminal sexual conduct, homicide or resulting in death, other sex offenses, robbery, and weapon possession as determined by the department based on specific crimes for which counties received reimbursement under the county jail reimbursement program in fiscal year 2007 and fiscal year 2008, and listed in the county jail reimbursement program document titled "FY 2007 and FY 2008 Group One Crimes Reimbursed", dated March 31, 2009. (b) "Group 2 crime" means a crime that is not a group 1 crime, including larceny, fraud, forgery, embezzlement, motor vehicle offenses, malicious destruction of property, controlled substance 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 offense, felony drunk driving, and other nonassaultive offenses. (c) "In the custody of the sheriff" means that the convicted felon has been sentenced to the county jail and either is housed in a county jail, is in custody but is being housed at a hospital or medical facility for a medical or mental health purpose, or has been released from jail and is being monitored through the use of the sheriff's electronic monitoring system. Sec. 321. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide all of the following information on the offender population in a monthly report: (a) Prison population by facility and security level, including the population of prisoners under the department's jurisdiction housed in county jails. (b) Net operating capacity according to the most recent certification report. (c) Electronic monitoring populations. (d) Parole populations. (e) Probation populations, with identification of the number of offenders in special alternative incarceration. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide all of the following information on the offender population in a quarterly report: (a) The number of closed housing units and beds in those units, including the security level of closed beds. (b) The number of prisoners serving life sentences. (c) The number of prisoners classified as past their earliest release date. (d) The number of prisoner intakes during the previous quarter. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (e) The number of prisoner exits, including paroles, maximum discharges, and other exits during the previous quarter. (3) If the department knows it will not meet the reporting requirements under this section, the department shall immediately issue a report that states that fact and that lists the reasons for not meeting the reporting requirements. Sec. 322. (1) On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on all of the following: (a) A detailed accounting of all vacant positions that exist within the department. (b) A detailed accounting of all correction officer positions at each correctional facility, including positions that are filled and positions that are vacant by facility. (c) A detailed accounting of all vacant positions that are health care related. (d) A detailed accounting of vacant positions that are being held open for temporarily nonactive employees. (2) As used in this section, "vacant position" means any position that has not been filled at any time during the past 6 calendar months. Sec. 323. The department may charge fees and collect revenues in excess of appropriations in part 1 not to exceed the cost of offender services and programming, employee meals, parolee loans, academic/vocational services, custody escorts, compassionate visits, union steward activities, and public works programs and services provided to local units of government or private nonprofit organizations. The revenues and fees collected are appropriated for all expenses associated with these services and activities. Sec. 324. It is the intent of the legislature that the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 department establish and maintain a management-to-staff ratio of not more than 1 supervisor for each 8 employees at the department's central office in Lansing and at both the northern and southern region administration offices. Sec. 325. The department shall provide the state court administrative office data sufficient to administer the swift and sure sanctions program. Sec. 326. The funds appropriated in part 1 for corrections officer pensions must be remitted to the state employees' retirement system for implementation costs if House Bill No. 4665, House Bill No. 4666, and House Bill No. 4667 of the 102nd Legislature are enacted into law. The funds appropriated in part 1 for corrections officer pensions that are remitted to the state employees' retirement system must be used to pay for costs associated with retirement benefit changes provided to employees in the departments of corrections, natural resources, health and human services, and state police that would be eligible under House Bill Numbers 4665, 4666, and 4667 of the 102nd Legislature. OFFENDER SUCCESS ADMINISTRATION Sec. 401. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide a report not later than March 1 on offender success expenditures, allocations, and performance. The report must include, but not be limited to, details on prior-year expenditures, including amounts spent on each project funded, itemized by service provided and service provider. Reported performance factors must be reported by region and must include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (a) The number of individuals who received transitional 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 housing services. (b) The average length of stay in transitional housing. (c) The number of individuals who received a referral for economic stability assistance and the number of referred individuals who secured employment or enrolled in education/training to increase economic stability. (d) The number of referred individuals who maintained employment for 12 months or more. (e) The total amount of leveraged services secured by the contractor. (2) As used in this section, "leveraged services" means services that benefit clients that are not directly paid for by the department, such as educational scholarships or grants, workforce training grants, or housing choice vouchers. (3) The department may accept cash or in-kind donations to supplement funds for prison education training, supplies, and materials necessary to complete the academic and jobs skills related programs. All funds received are appropriated and may be expended by the department. Any unexpended or unencumbered donations at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse to the general fund but shall be carried forward to the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 403. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for offender success services, the department, when reasonably possible, shall ensure that inmates have potential employer matches in the communities to which they will return prior to each inmate's initial parole hearing. Sec. 404. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall design services for offender success and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 vocational education programs, collaborating with the department of labor and economic opportunity and local entities to the extent deemed necessary by the director. The department shall ensure the program provides relevant professional development opportunities to prisoners that are high quality, demand driven, locally receptive, and responsive to the needs of communities where the prisoners are expected to reside after their release from correctional facilities. (2) Not later than March 1, the department shall provide a report detailing the results of the workforce development program. Sec. 405. Funds awarded for probation residential services in part 1 must provide for all of the following: (a) An initial client assessment reimbursement of $200.00. (b) A per diem reimbursement of not more than $70.00. Sec. 406. Allowable uses of community corrections comprehensive plans and services funds must include reimbursing counties for transportation, treatment costs, and housing drunk drivers during a period of assessment for treatment and case planning, in accordance with an approved comprehensive plan. Reimbursements for housing during the assessment process must be at the rate of $43.50 per day per offender, up to a maximum of 5 days per offender. Sec. 407. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall submit the following information for each county and counties consolidated for community corrections comprehensive plans: (a) Approved technical assistance grants and community corrections comprehensive plans including each program and level of funding, the utilization level of each program, and profile 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 information of enrolled offenders. (b) If federal funds are made available, the number of participants funded, the number served, the number successfully completing the program, and a summary of the program activity. (c) Status of the community corrections information system and the jail population information system. (d) Data on residential services, including participant data, participant sentencing guideline scores, program expenditures, average length of stay, and bed utilization data. (e) Offender disposition data by sentencing guideline range, by disposition type, by prior record variable score, by number and percent statewide and by county, current year, and comparisons to the previous 3 years. (f) Data on the use of funding made available under the drunk driver jail reduction and community treatment program. (2) The report required under subsection (1) must include the total funding allocated, program expenditures, required program data, and year-to-date totals. Sec. 408. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for public safety initiative, the law enforcement agency receiving funding under part 1 shall submit quarterly expenditure reports including a detailed listing of expenditures made, the purpose for which the expenditures were made, specific services provided, and the number of individuals served. Reports required under this section must be submitted to the standard report recipients and to the department of corrections. (2) As a condition of receiving funding appropriated for public safety initiative, reports required in the previous fiscal year must be submitted before funds may be disbursed for the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 current fiscal year. Sec. 409. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall establish and maintain policies and procedures that assist prisoners with obtaining a birth certificate, duplicate Social Security card, if eligible, DD Form 214 or other military documentation, state identification card, and operator's license before parole or discharge. Sec. 410. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for higher education in prison must be used by the department in collaboration with accredited universities or colleges to provide incarcerated individuals the opportunity to participate in comprehensive bachelor's degree programs at no cost to the incarcerated individual. The funds must be used for eligible expenses including staffing, supplies, and tuition. (2) The department must report not later than March 1 on all of the following for the previous fiscal year: (a) Expenditure of funds by university or college and correctional facility. (b) Number of participants served by university or college and correctional facility. (c) Enrollments, by race and gender, by university or college and correctional facility. (d) Number of participants who completed the program by university or college and correctional facility. Sec. 411. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for enhanced food technology program, the department shall maintain a program that provides on-the-job training in prison kitchens that provides prisoners the opportunity to earn food service training credentials recognized by the restaurant industry. The department shall use the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 funds appropriated in part 1 for enhanced food technology program to collaborate with the Michigan Restaurant and Lodging Association and other restaurant industry stakeholders to provide job placement assistance to individuals on probation or parole. Sec. 412. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for offender success programming, the department shall establish medication-assisted treatment offender success pilot programs. A medication-assisted treatment offender success pilot program must provide prerelease treatment and postrelease referral for opioid- or alcohol-addicted offenders who voluntarily participate in a medication-assisted treatment offender success pilot program. The department shall collaborate with residential and nonresidential substance use disorder treatment providers and with community-based clinics to provide postrelease assessment and treatment. The programs shall employ a multifaceted approach to treatment, including various forms of medication-assisted treatment approved by the Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of opioid use disorder or alcohol use disorder, counseling, and postrelease referral to community-based providers. If clinically appropriate, the department shall consider the use of long-acting injectable formulations of FDA-approved medication-assisted treatment for alcohol and opioid use disorder when developing an offender's release plan. (2) The department shall submit a report not later than December 1 on all of the following: (a) The number of offenders who received an injectable treatment for alcohol use disorder. (b) The number of offenders who received an injectable treatment for opioid use disorder before release. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) The number of offenders who subsequently received treatment in the community for a duration of not less than 3 months. (d) The number of offenders who received injections and were subsequently returned to prison during the previous fiscal year. Sec. 413. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall ensure that any inmate with a diagnosed mental illness is referred to a local mental health care provider that is able and willing to treat the inmate upon parole or discharge. Upon referral, the department shall ensure that the provider is informed of the inmate's current treatment plan including any medications that are currently prescribed to the inmate. Sec. 414. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for Goodwill Flip the Script must be distributed to a Michigan-chartered 501(c)(3) nonprofit corporation operating in a county with greater than 1,500,000 people for administration and expansion of a program that serves a population of individuals aged 16 to 39. The program must target individuals who are entering the criminal justice system for the first or second time and must assist those individuals through the following program types: (a) Alternative sentencing programs in partnership with a local district or circuit court. (b) Educational recovery for special adult populations with high rates of illiteracy. (c) Career development and continuing education. (d) Financial counseling and coaching services. (2) Not later than March 30, the selected program shall report on all of the following: (a) Program performance measurements. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The number of individuals diverted from incarceration. (c) The number of individuals served. (d) The outcomes of participants who completed the program. Sec. 415. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall report not later than March 1 on academic and vocational programs, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) The number of instructors and the number of instructor vacancies, by program and facility. (b) The number of prisoners enrolled in each program, the number of prisoners completing each program, the number of prisoners who do not complete each program, and the number of prisoners on waiting lists for each program. (c) The racial demographics of prisoners enrolled in each program. (d) The steps the department has undertaken to improve programs, track records, accommodate transfers and prisoners with health care needs, and reduce waiting lists. (e) The number of prisoners paroled without a high school diploma or a high school equivalency. (f) The number of prisoners not paroled at their earliest release date because of a lack of a high school equivalency and the reason those prisoners have not obtained a high school equivalency. Sec. 416. From the funds appropriated in part 1, priority may be given to funding reentry or rehabilitation programs, including faith-based initiatives, that have been demonstrated to reduce prison violence and recidivism. Sec. 417. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for criminal justice reinvestment must be used only to fund data collection and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 evidence-based programs designed to reduce recidivism among probationers, parolees, and prisoners. (2) Of the funds appropriated in part 1 for criminal justice reinvestment, not less than $600,000.00 must be allocated to an organization that has received a United States Department of Labor training to work 2-adult reentry grant to provide county jail inmates with programming and services to prepare them to get and keep jobs. Examples of eligible programs and services include, but are not limited to: adult education, tutoring, manufacturing skills training, participation in a simulated work environment, mentoring, cognitive therapy groups, life skills classes, substance use disorder recovery groups, fatherhood programs, classes in understanding the legal system, family literacy, health and wellness, finance management, employer presentations, and classes on job retention. Programming and support services should begin before release and continue after release from the county jail. To be eligible for funding, an organization must show not less than 2 years of data that demonstrate program success. (3) The department shall report on programs described under this section not later than March 30. The report must include all of the following: (a) The reincarceration recidivism rate of program participants. (b) The employment rate of participants who complete the program. (c) The cost of the program per participant. Sec. 418. Revenues appropriated and collected for program and special equipment funds must be considered state restricted revenue. Funding must be used for prisoner programming, special 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 equipment, and security projects. Not less than 75% of funding must be used for prisoner programming. Unexpended funds remaining at the close of the fiscal year must not lapse to the general fund but must be carried forward and made available for appropriation in subsequent fiscal years. Sec. 419. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall report on the department's plans to eliminate programming for prisoners. The report must be provided not less than 30 days before program elimination. As used in this section, "programming for prisoners" means a department core program or career and technical education program funded in part 1. FIELD OPERATIONS ADMINISTRATION Sec. 501. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall prepare individual reports not later than March 1 for the residential reentry program, the electronic monitoring program, and the special alternative to incarceration program. Each program's report must include information on all of the following: (a) Monthly new participants by type of offender. Residential reentry program participants must be categorized by reason for placement. For technical rule violators, the report must sort offenders by length of time since release from prison, by the most recent violation, and by the number of violations occurring since release from prison. (b) Monthly participant unsuccessful terminations, including cause. (c) Number of successful terminations. (d) End-of-month population by facility and program. (e) Average length of placement. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (f) Return to prison statistics. (g) Description of each program location or locations, capacity, and staffing. (h) Sentencing guideline scores and actual sentence statistics for participants, if applicable. (i) Comparison with previous year statistics. (j) Analysis of the impact on prison admissions, jail utilization, and the cost effectiveness of the program. Sec. 502. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall review and revise as necessary policy proposals that provide alternatives to prison for offenders being sentenced to prison as a result of technical probation violations and technical parole violations. To the extent the department has insufficient policies or resources to affect the continued increase in prison commitments among these offender populations, from the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall explore other policy options to allow for program alternatives, including department or OCC-funded programs, local level programs, and programs available through private agencies that may be used as prison alternatives for these offenders. (2) Not later than April 1, the department shall provide a report on the number of all parolees returned to prison and probationers sentenced to prison for either a technical violation or new sentence during the previous fiscal year. The report must include the following information for probationers, for parolees after their first parole, and for parolees who have been paroled more than once: (a) The numbers of parole and probation violators returned to or sent to prison for a new crime with a comparison of original 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 versus new offenses by major offense type: assaultive, nonassaultive, drug, and sex. (b) The numbers of parole and probation violators returned to or sent to prison for a technical violation and the type of violation, including, but not limited to, zero gun tolerance and substance use disorder violations. For parole technical rule violators, the report must list violations by type, by length of time since release from prison, by the most recent violation, and by the number of violations occurring since release from prison. (c) The educational history of those offenders, including how many had a high school equivalency or high school diploma before incarceration in prison, how many received a high school equivalency while in prison, and how many received a vocational certificate while in prison. (d) The number of offenders who participated in the reentry program versus the number of those who did not. (e) The unduplicated number of offenders who participated in substance use disorder treatment programs, mental health treatment programs, or both, while in prison, itemized by diagnosis. Sec. 503. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for residential alternative to prison program, the department shall provide vocational, educational, and cognitive programming in a secure environment to enhance existing alternative sentencing options, increase employment readiness and successful placement rates, and reduce new criminal behavior for the west Michigan probation violator population. The department must ensure that all of the following program goals are attained: (a) Participants successfully complete the program. (b) Participants completing the program earn a nationally 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 recognized credential for a career or vocational program. (c) Participants completing the program earn a certificate of completion for cognitive programming. (d) Reduction of the prison commitment rate for probation violators within the impacted geographic area. Sec. 504. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall issue quarterly reports for the previous 4 quarters detailing outcomes of prisoners who have been reviewed for parole. The report must include all of the following: (a) How many prisoners in each quarter were reviewed. (b) How many prisoners were granted parole. (c) How many prisoners were denied parole. (d) How many parole decisions were deferred. (e) The distribution of the total number of prisoners reviewed during that quarter grouped by whether the prisoner had been interviewed for the first, second, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, or more than sixth time. (f) The number of paroles granted, denied, or deferred for each of the parole guideline scores of low, average, and high. (g) The reason for denying or deferring parole. Sec. 505. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department must submit a report not later than March 1 each year, related to the medical parole process for the previous fiscal year. The report must include, but not be limited to, the following: (1) The number of incarcerated individuals who applied for medical parole the previous year, organized by reason for submission of the application, including the following: (a) Demographic data including race or ethnicity, gender, and age; 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The highest class of offense for which the individual is incarcerated; (c) Whether the applicant had applied for medical parole before and been denied, and, if so, when; and, (d) A basic description of the underlying medical condition that led to the application. (2) The number of incarcerated individuals who were referred to the medical parole process the following year, organized by reason for submission of the application, including the following: (a) Demographic data including race or ethnicity, gender, and age; (b) The highest class of offense for which the individual is incarcerated; (c) Whether the applicant had applied for medical parole before and been denied, and, if so, when; and, (d) A basic description of the underlying medical condition that led to the referral. (3) The number of medical parole hearings that took place in the previous year. (4) The number of individuals who were granted medical parole in the previous year, categorized by the following: (a) Demographic data including race or ethnicity, gender, and age; (b) Whether the person applied as a person who is medically incapacitated or a person who is terminally ill; (c) A basic description of the underlying medical condition that led to the application; (5) The number of individuals who were denied medical parole in the previous year, categorized by reason. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (6) The number of individuals who were serving medical parole at the end of the previous fiscal year. (7) The number of individuals who were previously granted medical parole but have since been returned to the custody of the department as of the end of the previous fiscal year, and the reasons for their return. HEALTH CARE Sec. 601. Not later than April 1, the department shall provide a report on all of the following: (a) Physical and mental health care, pharmaceutical services, and durable medical equipment for prisoners. A report under this section must detail previous fiscal year expenditures itemized by vendor, allocations, status of payments from contractors to vendors, and projected year-end expenditures from accounts. A report under this section must include a breakdown of all payments to the integrated care provider and to other providers itemized by physical health care, mental health care, pharmaceutical services, and durable medical equipment expenditures. (b) Pharmaceutical prescribing practices, including a detailed accounting of expenditures on antipsychotic medications, and any changes that have been made to the prescription drug formularies. (c) A status report on efforts to develop measurable data and outcomes for physical and mental health care within the prisoner population. Sec. 602. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide prisoners with a brochure that explains the purpose and importance of signing a medical release of information form. The department shall ensure that all prisoners, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 upon any health care treatment funded from appropriations in part 1, are given the opportunity to sign a medical release of information form designating a family member or other individual to whom the department shall release records and information regarding the prisoner upon the request of the prisoner. The prisoner may elect to withdraw or amend the medical release of information form at any time. (2) The department shall ensure that a signed medical release of information form follows a prisoner upon transfer to another department facility or to the supervision of a parole officer. (3) The medical release of information form must be placed online, on a public website managed by the department. Sec. 603. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall provide a report not later than April 1 on prisoner health care utilization in the previous fiscal year, by facility, that includes all of the following: (a) The number of inpatient hospital days. (b) The number of outpatient visits. (c) The number of emergency room visits. (d) The number of prisoners receiving off-site inpatient medical care. (e) The top 10 most common chronic care conditions. (2) The report required in subsection (1) must include all of the following: (a) The amounts collected annually for all medical co-payments paid by prisoners, itemized by categories such as medical, dental, and prescription, including those items listed under subsection (1)(a) to (d). (b) The amounts collected from prisoners for any other medical 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 services, medication, medical devices, or any other payments for medical services that are not a co-payments. Sec. 604. Funds appropriated in part 1 for Hepatitis C treatment must be used only to purchase specialty medication for Hepatitis C treatment in the prison population. In addition to the above appropriation, any rebates received from the medications used must be used only to purchase specialty medication for Hepatitis C treatment. Not later than February 15, the department shall issue a report for the previous fiscal year that includes all of the following: (a) The total amount spent on specialty medication for the treatment of Hepatitis C. (b) The number of prisoners who were treated for Hepatitis C. (c) The amount of any rebates that were received from the purchase of specialty medication, and what, if any, outstanding rebates are expected to be received. (d) The Hepatitis C status of all incoming prisoners and the number of prisoners who are reinfected while incarcerated and require retreatment for Hepatitis C. (e) The number of those treated and released and then retreated upon reincarceration. Sec. 605. Not later than March 1, the department shall provide an annual report on the utilization of Medicaid benefits for prisoners. Sec. 606. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for mental health and substance use disorder treatment, the department shall maintain not less than 3 medication-assisted treatment clinics at correctional facilities that allow the department to treat the highest number of prisoners with opioid use disorder possible. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Funding must be used by the department to support costs of staff, including nurses, qualified mental health professionals, recovery coaches, and corrections officers, and costs of medication and supplies. Participating prisoners must be provided with the option of receiving 1 injection of medication immediately before being released from prison into the community. (2) The department shall submit quarterly reports on the establishment and operation of medication-assisted treatment clinics. A report under this subsection must include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (a) Clinic site locations. (b) Staffing levels. (c) Expenditures on staffing and supplies, including oral and injectable medications. (d) Number of prisoners treated. (e) Number of prisoners requiring treatment, but not yet receiving treatment. (3) Not later than March 1, the department shall report on the number of prisoners who received medication-assisted therapies. The report must include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (a) The length of time each prisoner received those therapies. (b) The number of prisoners who have discontinued treatment while incarcerated. (c) A listing of the medications used in medication-assisted therapies. (d) The number of prisoners prescribed each medication listed in subdivision (c). (e) Details on the operation of medication-assisted treatment clinics, including clinic site locations, staffing levels, and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 expenditures for staffing, supplies, and medications. CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES AND ADMINISTRATION Sec. 701. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for prison food service, the department shall report not later than January 15 on the following: (a) Average per-meal cost for prisoner food service. Per-meal cost includes all costs directly related to the provision of food for the prisoner population, including, but not limited to, actual food costs, total compensation for all food service workers, including benefits and legacy costs, and inspection and compliance costs for food service. (b) Food service-related contracts, including goods or services to be provided and the vendor. (c) Major sanitation violations. Sec. 702. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall report the cost per prisoner per day for each security custody level. This cost must include all actual direct and indirect costs for the previous fiscal year. To calculate the cost per prisoner per day, the department shall divide the prisoner-related costs by the total number of prisoner days for each custody level and correctional facility. For multilevel facilities, costs that cannot be accurately allocated to each custody level may be included in the calculation on a per-prisoner basis for each facility. A report summarizing these calculations must be submitted not later than January 15. Prisoner-related costs included in the cost per prisoner per day calculation must include all expenditures for the following, from all fund sources: (a) New custody staff training. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Prison industries operations. (c) Education/skilled trades/career readiness programs. (d) Enhanced food technology program. (e) Offender success programming. (f) Central records. (g) Correctional facilities administration. (h) Housing inmates in federal institutions. (i) Inmate legal services. (j) Leased beds and alternatives to leased beds. (k) Prison food service. (l) Prison store operations. (m) Transportation. (n) Health care. (o) Correctional facilities. (p) Northern and southern region administration and support. Sec. 703. Any local unit of government or private nonprofit organization that contracts with the department for public works services is responsible for financing the entire cost of such an agreement. Sec. 704. The department shall allow the Michigan Braille transcribing fund program to operate at designated locations. The department shall continue to encourage the Michigan Braille transcribing fund program to produce high-quality materials for use by the visually impaired. Sec. 705. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall report all of the following regarding critical incidents by facility: (a) Within 72 hours of occurrence, any critical incident occurring at a correctional facility. The report must identify the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 facility at which the incident occurred. (b) Not later than March 1, the number of critical incidents occurring each month at each facility during the previous calendar year, categorized by type and severity of each incident. (2) For each critical incident requiring an investigation, within 72 hours of the completion of that investigation, the department must provide all of the following: (a) A report summarizing the results of the investigation. (b) If the critical incident resulted in a prisoner death, the officially determined cause of death. (3) Pursuant to the requirements of subsection (2), if the cause of death is determined to be a drug overdose, the required report must include the classification of the drug, including, but not limited to: Tylenol, opioids, or a mixture of drugs, if determinable. (4) Additionally, the department must provide an annual report by September 15 listing the number of drug overdose deaths by facility, and broken down by the classification of the drug as described in subsection (3). (5) As used in this section, "critical incident" includes a prisoner assault on staff that results in a serious physical injury to staff, an escape or attempted escape, a prisoner disturbance that causes facility operation concerns, a drug overdose or suspected overdose that results in inpatient hospitalization, and an unexpected death of a prisoner. Sec. 706. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall report not later than March 1 on all of the following ratios for each correctional facility: (a) Corrections officers to prisoners. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Shift command staff to line custody staff. (c) Noncustody institutional staff to prisoners. Sec. 707. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall focus on providing required programming to prisoners as early as possible during the prisoner's sentence in order to impact the prisoner's behavior while incarcerated, and prioritize individuals who are past their earliest release date and have not been paroled because of not having received the required programming. Programming includes, but is not limited to, violence prevention programming, sexual abuse prevention programming, substance use disorder programming, thinking for a change programming, and any other programming that is required as a condition of parole. Nothing in this section makes parole denial appealable in court. (2) The department shall submit a quarterly report detailing enrollment in sex abuse prevention programming, violence prevention programming, and thinking for a change programming. At a minimum, the report must include all of the following: (a) A full accounting, from the date of entrance to prison, of the number of individuals who are required to complete the programming, but have not yet done so. (b) The number of individuals who have reached their earliest release date, but who have not completed required programming. (c) A plan of action for addressing any waiting lists or backlogs for programming that may exist. Sec. 708. If a pregnant prisoner in a facility funded from appropriations in part 1 consents to a visitor being present, the department shall allow that 1 person to be present during the prisoner's labor and delivery, in addition to a doula being present 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 if the pregnant prisoner wants to work with a doula. The person allowed to accompany the prisoner must be an immediate family member, legal guardian, spouse, or domestic partner. The department is authorized to deny access to a visitor if the department has a safety concern with that visitor's access. The department is authorized to conduct a criminal background check on the visitor. Sec. 709. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall evaluate all prisoners at intake for substance use disorders, serious developmental disorders, serious mental illness, and other mental health disorders. Prisoners with serious mental illness or serious developmental disorders must not be removed from the general population as a punitive response to behavior caused by their serious mental illness or serious developmental disorder. A prisoner with serious mental illness or serious developmental disorder that is unresponsive to treatment who presents a persistent high violence risk or engages in severe disruptive behavior may be placed in secure residential housing programs that facilitate access to institutional programming and ongoing mental health services funded from appropriations in part 1. A prisoner with serious mental illness or serious developmental disorder who is confined in these specialized housing programs must be evaluated or monitored by a medical professional at a frequency of not less than every 12 hours. Sec. 710. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall report not later than March 1 on the number of prisoners during the previous fiscal year in administrative segregation and, of those, the number who at any time during the current or previous prison term were diagnosed with serious mental illness or have a developmental disorder and the number of days 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 each of the prisoners with serious mental illness or a developmental disorder have been confined to administrative segregation. (2) The report required in subsection (1) must include a chart listing the number of prisoners housed in administrative segregation for each of the following time periods: (a) A continuous period exceeding 3 months but less than 6 months. (b) A continuous period exceeding 6 months but less than 12 months. (c) A continuous period exceeding 12 months or longer. (3) For any prisoner housed in administrative segregation for 12 months or longer, an explanation of the circumstances surrounding the prisoner's placement in administrative segregation. Sec. 711. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Ensure that any inmate care and control staff in contact with prisoners less than 18 years of age are adequately trained with regard to the developmental and mental health needs of prisoners less than 18 years of age. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on the training curriculum used and the number and types of staff receiving annual training under that curriculum. (b) Provide appropriate placement for prisoners less than 18 years of age who have serious mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or a serious developmental disorder and need to be housed separately from the general population. Prisoners less than 18 years of age who have serious mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or a serious developmental disorder must not be 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 removed from an existing placement as a punitive response to behavior caused by their serious mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or a serious developmental disorder. A prisoner who is less than 18 years of age with serious mental illness or a serious developmental disorder that is unresponsive to treatment who presents a persistent high violence risk or engages in severe disruptive behavior may be placed in secure residential housing programs that facilitate access to institutional programming and ongoing mental health services. A prisoner less than 18 years of age with serious mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or a serious developmental disorder who is confined in these specialized housing programs must be evaluated or monitored by a medical professional at a frequency of not less than every 12 hours. (c) Implement a specialized offender success program that recognizes the needs of prisoners less than 18 years of age for supervised offender success. Sec. 712. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall submit quarterly reports on the number of youth in prison. The report must include, but not be limited to, all of the following information: (a) The total number of inmates less than 18 years of age who are not on Holmes youthful trainee act status. (b) The total number of inmates less than 18 years of age who are on Holmes youthful trainee act status. (c) The total number of inmates aged 18 to 23 who are on Holmes youthful trainee act status. Sec. 713. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department must submit a report on the number of prisoners who lost 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 visiting privileges. The report required under this section must be submitted not later than November 15 and include data for the previous fiscal year. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The number of prisoners who lost visiting privileges by race and by violation type. (b) The number of cumulative days visitation rights were lost since the start of the fiscal year. (c) The number of prisoners who applied to have visiting privileges restored. (d) The number of prisoners who had visiting privileges restored. (e) The number of prisoners who had visiting restrictions extended. Sec. 714. Funds appropriated in part 1 for intelligence unit must be used by the department to maintain an intelligence unit to conduct investigatory and intelligence operations for the department. Intelligence operations must include, but not be limited to, intelligence operations for prisoner phone services. Savings that result from transferring responsibility for intelligence operations from the contractor to the department must be passed on to prisoners and prisoners' families as the department continues to negotiate lower phone call rates in all future contracts. The department must continue to pursue all opportunities for reducing further the cost of phone calls for prisoners and prisoners' families. Sec. 715. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department must submit a preliminary report on the department's plans to close, consolidate, or relocate any correctional facility 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 in the state. The preliminary report must be provided not less than 30 days before the effective date of the closure, consolidation, or relocation. The preliminary report must include the projected savings to the state from closure, consolidation, or relocation of the facility and must include a projection of the potential impact on staff positions. (2) After a prison closure, consolidation, or relocation, the department must submit a report on the actual savings achieved by the department and the impact on staff positions. Savings amounts and impact on staff positions must be itemized by facility. The report required under this subsection must be submitted 6 months after the prison closure, consolidation, or relocation. (3) If the department is planning to close a correctional facility, the department must complete an analysis of the potential economic impact of the correctional facility closure on the local community where the facility is located. The analysis must be submitted within 30 days of the department's announcement regarding closure of the facility. Sec. 716. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall consult with the legislature and other appropriate state agencies to develop a framework to provide investment in communities that have formerly operational state correctional facilities that have been closed. This framework must include plans to ensure that vacant state correctional facilities do not become a nuisance or danger to the community. Sec. 717. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall make an information packet for the families of incoming prisoners available on the department's website. The information packet must be reviewed not later than February 1 and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 updated as necessary. The department may partner with external advocacy groups and actual families of prisoners in the packet-writing process to ensure that the information is useful and complete. The packet must provide information on topics including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) How to put money into prisoner accounts. (b) How to make telephone calls or create Jpay email accounts. (c) How to visit in person. (d) Proper procedures for filing complaints or grievances. (e) The rights of prisoners to physical and mental health care. (f) The purpose and importance of prisoners signing a medical release of information form. (g) How to utilize the offender tracking information system (OTIS). (h) Truth in sentencing and how it applies to minimum sentences. (i) The parole process. (j) Guidance on the importance of the role of families in the reentry process. Sec. 718. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department must pursue all opportunities to reduce costs for prisoners and prisoners' families for financial deposit fees and commissary fees when the department negotiates or renews any contract to provide these services. Sec. 719. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for contraband prevention, the department must reform the department's strip search protocol such that it results in fewer and less intrusive strip searches of prisoners to maintain the safety and security of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 correctional facilities. The department must provide a report by April 1 each year on the efforts undertaken. Sec. 720. Pursuant to the provisions as stated in Policy Directive 04.01.110, issued on December 27, 2022, all current members of the legislature in good standing are exempt from Part 2 of the policy directive that requires a 72-hour notice before a visitation. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 801. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for A Brighter Way must be used by the department to support a contract with the goal of supporting peer-led reentry programming. The contract must include peer-led group mentoring, along with 1-on-1 peer mentoring for referred parolees to improve housing, civic engagement, transportation, education, employment, and access to health care and insurance. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for A Brighter Way, the program must enlist an accredited Michigan university to perform an independent program evaluation of the? program. (3) By July 1, A Brighter Way must submit a report that includes all of the following information, as applicable: (a) A list of program expenditures. (b) The number of enrollees. (c) The number of job placements. (d) The rate of 30-day, 90-day, and 2-year employment retention post release. (e) The number of individuals who successfully complete a court-ordered sentence. (f) The 1-, 2-, and 3-year return to prison rates, if 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 available. (g) Outcomes and performance measures. (4) A Brighter Way must comply with all of the requirements set forth under section 808. Sec. 802. Funds appropriated in part 1 for ambulance service reimbursements must be used by the department to reimburse ambulance service providers for services rendered to the department and for which they did not receive compensation from the department's previous healthcare contract providers. Sec. 803. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Eastern Michigan University, the university must provide incarcerated individuals nearing release with the opportunity to complete a comprehensive bachelor's degree program at no cost to the student. Funding must be used for eligible expenses, including staffing, supplies, and tuition. (2) Eastern Michigan University must report by July 1 on expenditure of funds, number of participants served, enrollments by race and gender, and number of participants that complete the program. (3) Eastern Michigan University must submit a report by July 1 to the standard report recipients. The report must include the following information, as applicable: (a) A list of program expenditures. (b) The number of enrollees. (c) The number of job placements. (d) The rate of 30-day, 90-day, and 2-year employment retention post release. (e) The number of individuals that successfully complete a court-ordered sentence. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (f) The 1-, 2-, and 3-year return to prison rates, if available. (g) Outcomes and performance measures. (4) Eastern Michigan University must comply with all of the requirements set forth under section 808. Sec. 804. Funds appropriated in part 1 for facility cell block railing safety improvements must be used by the department to upgrade all railings in cell block housing units. Improvements must be made to prevent an individual from jumping over, under, or through any railings surrounding cell block housing units. The department will prioritize facilities where individuals have fallen, been injured, or died. Sec. 805. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 in the one-time appropriations unit for Goodwill Flip the Script must be used solely for the purpose of expanding the program that serves a population of individuals aged 16 to 39 outside the area currently served by the program described in section 414. The program must target individuals who are entering the criminal justice system for the first or second time and must assist those individuals through the following program types: (a) Alternative sentencing programs in partnership with a local district or circuit court. (b) Educational recovery for special adult populations with high rates of illiteracy. (c) Career development and continuing education for women. (2) The report required in section 414 shall include the expanded area's program performance measurements, the number of individuals diverted from incarceration, the number of individuals served, and outcomes of participants completing the program. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) Goodwill Flip the Script must submit a report by July 1 to the standard report recipients. The report must include the following information, as applicable: (a) A list of program expenditures. (b) The number of enrollees. (c) The number of job placements. (d) The rate of 30-day, 90-day, and 2-year employment retention post release. (e) The number of individuals that successfully complete a court-ordered sentence. (f) The 1-, 2-, and 3-year return to prison rates, if available. (g) Outcomes and performance measures. (4) Goodwill Flip the Script must comply with all of the requirements set forth under section 808. Sec. 806. Funds appropriated in part 1 for peer recovery coaches must be used by the department to provide additional funding with the goal of embedding peer recovery coaches throughout Michigan. The coaches would train 250 individuals with the goal of more consistently providing peer recovery supports in prisons around the state for offenders suffering from substance use disorders. Sec. 807. Funds appropriated in part 1 for reducing medical co-payments must be used by the department to make every effort to? lower the co-payment amounts for prisoners for medical services or other medical needs. Sec. 808. (1) Outcomes and performance measures for A Brighter Way, the Eastern Michigan University pilot program, and the one-time Goodwill Flip the Script program must include at least the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 following, as applicable to each program or entity as stated in their program goals: (a) The number of individuals who obtain critical documents within 90 days of release and the nature of those documents. (b) The number of individuals who access at least one community resource such as housing or transportation within 90 days of release and the nature of that resource. (c) The number of individuals who obtain medical insurance and a health care provider or providers within 90 days of release. (d) The number of individuals who report increased positive social activity within 90 days of release. (e) The number of individuals employed or enrolled in an educational or vocational program, or both, within 60 to 90 days of release. (f) The rate of job retention, housing, and education up to 12 months after release. (g) The number of individuals in stable housing within 60 to 90 days of release. (h) The number of individuals with adequate health care access, including access to medical, dental, behavioral health, and pharmacy services within 60 to 90 days of release. (i) The recidivism rate in the first year, including a breakdown of procedural violations and new charges. (j) With respect to recidivism, an accounting of procedural violations versus new charges. (k) Substance use status, including alcohol, drug use, and smoking. (l) Analysis of referral patterns. (m) Comparison of de-identified client assessments. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (n) Civic engagement, including, but not limited to, voter registration. (o) Tracking office-based versus community-based sessions with clients to search for correlations and causation with outcomes. (p) Use of incentives. (q) Differences in outcomes for reentry from jail versus prison. (r) Participation satisfaction. (s) Fidelity to program values such as confidentiality, code of ethics, and mutuality. (t) Use of evidence-based and best practices, such as motivational interviewing and restorative practices. (u) Supervisory performance reviews. (v) Reporting and documentation burden. (w) Use of technology, including social media. (x) Effectiveness of resource networks. (y) Time required per client. (z) Quality of life improvement or other health-related measures. (aa) Self-efficacy improvement. (2) Any data collected must be provided to the legislature and must be made available to accredited universities for research purposes. Sec. 809. (1) It is the intent of the legislature that the state budget director use the state budget director's authority under section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a, to lapse a total of $15,600,100.00 appropriated under 2019 PA 64 for work project number W2234021, designated for the Gus Harrison Correctional Facility, work project number W2246021, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 designated for the Michigan Reformatory, and work project number W2270021, designated for the Womens Huron Valley Correctional Complex. (2) It is the intent of the legislature that funds appropriated in part 1 from work project lapse funds are available for expenditure for the purposes identified in part 1 using proceeds of the work project lapse listed in subsection (1). (3) It is the intent of the legislature that an appropriation using the proceeds from the lapsed work project identified under subsection (1) may be spent only if the appropriation is for a purpose that is an allowable use of the fund source for the work project identified to be lapsed under subsection (1).